Illinois, session 104th, HB2517.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Department of Professional Regulation Law 5of the Civil Administrative Code of Illinois is amended by 6changing Section 2105-15.7 as follows: 7    (20 ILCS 2105/2105-15.7)8    Sec. 2105-15.7. Implicit bias awareness training. 9    (a) As used in this Section: , 10    "Health health care professional" means a person licensed 11or registered by the Department of Financial and Professional 12Regulation under the following Acts: Medical Practice Act of 131987, Nurse Practice Act, Clinical Psychologist Licensing Act, 14Illinois Dental Practice Act, Illinois Optometric Practice Act 15of 1987, Pharmacy Practice Act, Illinois Physical Therapy Act, 16Physician Assistant Practice Act of 1987, Acupuncture Practice 17Act, Illinois Athletic Trainers Practice Act, Clinical Social 18Work and Social Work Practice Act, Dietitian Nutritionist 19Practice Act, Home Medical Equipment and Services Provider 20License Act, Naprapathic Practice Act, Nursing Home 21Administrators Licensing and Disciplinary Act, Illinois 22Occupational Therapy Practice Act, Illinois Optometric 23Practice Act of 1987, Podiatric Medical Practice Act of 1987,   HB2517 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 11976 BDA 22070 b1Respiratory Care Practice Act, Professional Counselor and 2Clinical Professional Counselor Licensing and Practice Act, 3Sex Offender Evaluation and Treatment Provider Act, Illinois 4Speech-Language Pathology and Audiology Practice Act, 5Perfusionist Practice Act, Registered Surgical Assistant and 6Registered Surgical Technologist Title Protection Act, and 7Genetic Counselor Licensing Act.8    "Maternal health care services" means prenatal care or 9postnatal care.10    "Postnatal care" means an office visit to a health care 11professional for the purposes of care related to 12post-pregnancy that occurs within 12 months after a person has 13given birth, with reference to the person who has given birth.14    "Prenatal care" has the meaning given to that term in the 15Maternal Mental Health Conditions Education, Early Diagnosis, 16and Treatment Act. 17    (b) A For license or registration renewals occurring on or 18after January 1, 2023, a health care professional who has 19continuing education requirements must complete at least a 20one-hour course in training on implicit bias awareness per 21renewal period. On and after July 1, 2026, for health care 22professionals who report to the Department that they provide 23maternal health care services and seek to renew a license or 24registration, the one-hour course in training on implicit bias 25awareness shall include training in potential maternal health 26risk factors associated with childbearing individuals who are   HB2517 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 11976 BDA 22070 b1part of a marginalized racial or ethnic group with increased 2maternal mortality rates. A health care professional may count 3this one hour for completion of this course toward meeting the 4minimum credit hours required for continuing education. Any 5training on implicit bias awareness applied to meet any other 6State licensure requirement, professional accreditation or 7certification requirement, or health care institutional 8practice agreement may count toward the one-hour requirement 9under this Section.10    (c) The Department may adopt rules for the implementation 11of this Section.12(Source: P.A. 102-4, eff. 4-27-21; 102-674, eff. 11-30-21.)